Hawaii statutes.
§356D-153 Qualified tenant defined;
preference. (a) As used in this part, "qualified tenant" means
any single person or family, pursuant to criteria and procedures established by
the authority, who has been determined to have an income not exceeding the
income limit as determined by the authority pursuant to rules adopted by the
authority; provided that the income limit shall not exceed ninety‑five
per cent of the annual median income as determined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development; provided further that the
qualified tenant's primary place of residence shall be in the State or the
qualified tenant intends to make the State the qualified tenant's primary place
of residence. The terms "qualified tenant" and "tenant"
shall include a person or family who satisfies the foregoing requirements and
is a member of a cooperative who, upon resale of the member's membership to the
cooperative, will not be reimbursed for more than fifty per cent of any equity
increment accumulated through payments under this part.

With respect to members of a cooperative, as
used in this part, the terms "rental" and "rental charges"
mean the charges under the occupancy agreements between the members and the
cooperative.

(b) The authority shall give preference to
qualified tenants with incomes at or below eighty per cent of the annual median
income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 223, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next